Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2876.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 38-431.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE38-431.01. Public bodies; open meetings required; seating; minutes; posting; recordings; open calls A. All meetings of any public body shall be public meetings and all persons so desiring shall be allowed to attend and listen to the deliberations and proceedings. All legal action of public bodies shall occur during a public meeting. B. Schools, school boards, executive boards and municipalities shall provide for an amount of seating sufficient to accommodate the reasonably anticipated attendance of all persons desiring to attend the deliberations and proceedings, when feasible. This section does not require a public body to relocate a meeting outside of the largest regular meeting room. C. All public bodies shall provide for the taking of written minutes or a recording of all their meetings, including executive sessions. For meetings other than executive sessions, the minutes or recording shall include: 1. The date, time and place of the meeting. 2. The members of the public body recorded as either present or absent. 3. A general description of the matters considered. 4. An accurate description of all legal actions proposed, discussed or taken, including a record of how each member voted. The minutes shall also include the names of the members who propose each motion and the names of the persons, as given, who make statements or present material to the public body and a reference to the legal action about which they made statements or presented material. D. Minutes of executive sessions shall include items set forth in subsection C, paragraphs 1, 2 and 3 of this section, an accurate description of all instructions given pursuant to section 38-431.03, subsection A, paragraphs 4, 5 and 7 and other matters as may be deemed appropriate by the public body. E. The minutes or a recording of a meeting shall be available for public inspection three working days after the meeting except as otherwise specifically provided by this article. F. A public body of a city or town with a population of more than two thousand five hundred persons shall: 1. Within three working days after a meeting, except for subcommittees and advisory committees, post on its website, if applicable, either: (a) A statement describing the legal actions taken by the public body of the city or town during the meeting. (b) Any recording of the meeting. 2. Within two working days following approval of the minutes, post approved minutes of city or town council meetings on its website, if applicable, except as otherwise specifically provided by this article. 3. Within ten working days after a subcommittee or advisory committee meeting, post on its website, if applicable, either: (a) A statement describing legal action, if any. (b) A recording of the meeting. G. All or any part of a public meeting of a public body may be recorded by any person in attendance by means of a tape recorder or camera or any other means of sonic reproduction, provided that there is no active interference with the conduct of the meeting. H. The secretary of state for state public bodies, the city or town clerk for municipal public bodies and the county clerk for all other local public bodies shall conspicuously post open meeting law materials prepared and approved by the attorney general on their website. A person elected or appointed to a public body shall review the open meeting law materials at least one day before the day that person takes office. I. A public body may make an open call to the public during a public meeting, subject to reasonable time, place and manner restrictions, to allow individuals to address the public body on any issue within the jurisdiction of the public body. At the conclusion of an open call to the public, individual members of the public body may respond to criticism made by those who have addressed the public body, may ask staff to review a matter or may ask that a matter be put on a future agenda. However, members of the public body shall not discuss or take legal action on matters raised during an open call to the public unless the matters are properly noticed for discussion and legal action. J. A member of a public body shall not knowingly direct any staff member to communicate in violation of this article. K. Any posting required by subsection F of this section must remain on the applicable website for at least one year after the date of the posting. L. a public body may not place any proposal to impose or increase a tax rate, assessment or fee in this state on the consent agenda for a meeting of the public body. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 38-431.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE38-431.03. Executive sessions; definitions A. On a public majority vote of the members constituting a quorum, a public body may hold an executive session but only for the following purposes: 1. Discussion or consideration of employment, assignment, appointment, promotion, demotion, dismissal, salaries, disciplining or resignation of a public officer, appointee or employee of any public body, except that, with the exception of salary discussions, an officer, appointee or employee may demand that the discussion or consideration occur at a public meeting. The public body shall provide the officer, appointee or employee with written notice of the executive session as is appropriate but not less than twenty-four hours for the officer, appointee or employee to determine whether the discussion or consideration should occur at a public meeting. 2. Discussion or consideration of records exempt by law from public inspection, including the receipt and discussion of information or testimony that is specifically required to be maintained as confidential by state or federal law. 3. Discussion or consultation for legal advice with the attorney or attorneys of the public body. 4. Discussion or consultation with the attorneys of the public body in order to consider its position and instruct its attorneys regarding the public body's position regarding contracts that are the subject of negotiations, in pending or contemplated litigation or in settlement discussions conducted in order to avoid or resolve litigation. 5. Discussions or consultations with designated representatives of the public body in order to consider its position and instruct its representatives regarding negotiations with employee organizations regarding the salaries, salary schedules or compensation paid in the form of fringe benefits of employees of the public body. 6. Discussion, consultation or consideration for international and interstate negotiations or for negotiations by a city or town, or its designated representatives, with members of a tribal council, or its designated representatives, of an Indian reservation located within or adjacent to the city or town. 7. Discussions or consultations with designated representatives of the public body in order to consider its position and instruct its representatives regarding negotiations for the purchase, sale or lease of real property. 8. Discussion or consideration of matters relating to school safety operations or school safety plans or programs. 9. Discussions or consultations with designated representatives of the public body in order to discuss security plans, procedures, assessments, measures or systems relating to, or having an impact on, the security or safety of buildings, facilities, operations, critical infrastructure information and information technology maintained by the public body.  Records, documentation, notes,  or other materials made by, or provided to, the representatives pursuant to this paragraph are confidential and exempt from public disclosure under this chapter and title 39, chapter 1. B. Minutes of and discussions made at executive sessions shall be kept confidential except from: 1. Members of the public body that met in executive session. 2. Officers, appointees or employees who were the subject of discussion or consideration pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section. 3. The auditor general on a request made in connection with an audit authorized as provided by law. 4. A county attorney or the attorney general when investigating alleged violations of this article. C. The public body shall instruct persons who are present at the executive session regarding the confidentiality requirements of this article. D. Legal action involving a final vote or decision shall not be taken at an executive session, except that the public body may instruct its attorneys or representatives as provided in subsection A, paragraphs 4, 5 and 7 of this section.  A public vote shall be taken before any legal action binds the public body.  A matter that is discussed in executive session on which the public body must take a final vote or make a final decision must be placed on the regular agenda and may not be placed on the consent agenda. E. Except as provided in section 38-431.02, subsections I and J, a public body shall not discuss any matter in an executive session that is not described in the notice of the executive session. F. Disclosure of executive session information pursuant to this section or section 38-431.06 does not constitute a waiver of any privilege, including the attorney-client privilege. Any person receiving executive session information pursuant to this section or section 38-431.06 shall not disclose that information except to the attorney general or county attorney, by agreement with the public body or to a court in camera for purposes of enforcing this article. Any court that reviews executive session information shall take appropriate action to protect privileged information. G. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Critical infrastructure" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-1801. 2. "Information technology" has the same meaning prescribed in section 18-101.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.